North Carolina, session 2025, SB981.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

ESTABLISH THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN EDUCATION TASK FORCE
SECTION 1.(a) Establishment. – There is established the Artificial Intelligence in
Education (AIE) Task Force to gather information and decide the best means to utilize and
oversee the use of artificial intelligence (AI) tools and systems in educational settings.
SECTION 1.(b) Voting Members. – The AIE Task Force shall consist of the
following six voting members:
(1) One member of the North Carolina Senate, appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, and one member of the North Carolina House of
Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House, to serve as cochairs
of the Task Force.
(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her designee.
(3) The Chair of The University of North Carolina Board of Governors, or his or
her designee.
(4) The Secretary of the Department of Information Technology, or his or her
designee.
(5) A representative of the North Carolina AI Leadership Council, to be chosen
by the Council.
SECTION 1.(c) Advisory Members. – The Chairpersons of the AIE Task Force,
with the advice and consent of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Chair of The
University of North Carolina Board of Governors, and the Secretary of the Department of
Information Technology, or their designees, may appoint ex officio nonvoting members to the
Task Force to serve in an advisory capacity for such terms to be determined at the discretion of
the Task Force. The voting members of the Task Force, upon majority vote of those present and
voting, may reduce or expand the number of ex officio members who may serve on the Task
Force, provided that such members are deemed necessary to provide expertise or access to
resources involving AI technology and are representative of:
(1) Workforce development.
(2) Elementary and secondary education, public or private.
(3) Four-year postsecondary education, public or proprietary.
(4) Private business entities.
*S981-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) Rules. – The Task Force shall adopt rules and regulations governing
times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business. A majority
of the members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting any business, and a
majority vote of all members present shall be required for any recommendations to the General
Assembly.
SECTION 1.(e) Purpose. – The Task Force shall be responsible for balancing
innovation and public interest while endeavoring to mitigate risks and unintended consequences
of AI and its regulation. The Task Force shall:
(1) Develop tentative drafts of any necessary proposed revisions to the North
Carolina General Statutes involving the regulation of AI technologies in
educational contexts.
(2) Review laws, policies, and procedures concerning the use of AI technology in
the educational context established by the United States Congress and other
states, focusing specifically on (i) data privacy and protection, (ii)
development of a framework for testing AI tools, (iii) compliance with ethical
standards, and (iv) liability.
(3) Consider implementation and use of AI in schools and compile a list of
recommendations of best practices and potential uses for AI in schools.
(4) Consider ways to allocate funding for development and use of AI in schools.
SECTION 1.(f) Administrative Support. – All clerical and other services required
by the Task Force shall be supplied by the Department of Public Instruction. The members of the
Task Force shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance
with the provisions of G.S. 138-5.
SECTION 1.(g) Term. – The Task Force shall commence within 15 days of the
effective date of this act, upon the call of the cochairs, and at its first meeting shall elect any
officers from among its members as it deems necessary for the efficient discharge of the Task
Force's duties. The Task Force shall dissolve on December 31, 2027.
SECTION 1.(h) The Task Force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15, 2028.

REQUIRE AGE-APPROPRIATE INSTRUCTION ON ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SECTION 2.(a) Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.66. Artificial intelligence instruction.
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt standards for age-appropriate instruction on
artificial intelligence (AI) for kindergarten through grade 12. The standards shall include at least
the following:
(1) The basic concepts of artificial intelligence, including an age-appropriate
understanding of how AI systems source and create content.
(2) Real-world applications of AI.
(3) Responsible, ethical use of AI.
(4) How to access relevant AI tools.
(5) Critical thinking skills related to analyzing outputs of AI.
(b) The standards adopted by the State Board may allow for AI instruction pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section to be included in the standards for computer science courses offered
in middle school and high school.
(c) To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the Department of Public
Instruction shall provide professional development for teachers and administrators related to AI
and its use in education."
Page 2 Senate Bill 981-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of this section.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Section 2(b) of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder
of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 981-First Edition Page 3